Wyoming, session 2025, HB0093.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 17-33-101 is created to read:

CHAPTER 33
NATURAL ASSET COMPANIES

17-33-101. Natural asset companies; definition;
prohibition.
HB0093

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0309

(a) As used in this section, "natural asset company"
means a company:

(i) That holds a conservation interest in land
in Wyoming or has the rights to the ecological performance,
including value from natural assets and the production of
ecosystem services, of a defined land area in Wyoming and
has the authority to manage such area for conservation,
restoration or sustainable management; and

(ii) The primary purpose, with respect to such
defined land area in Wyoming, is to:

(A) Manage, maintain, restore and grow the
value of natural assets and the production of ecosystem
services in the area; or

(B) Carry out activities that do not cause
any material adverse impact on the condition of the natural
assets in the area and replenish the natural resources used
in the area.

HB0093

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0309
(b) It shall be unlawful for a natural asset company
having a conservation interest in land or defined land area
entirely within Wyoming to sell its credits through a
national securities exchange registered under 15 U.S.C. §
78f. This subsection shall not prohibit a natural asset
company from selling its credits from land it holds outside
the state of Wyoming.

Section 2. This act shall apply to natural asset
companies with conservation interests in land or defined
land areas entirely within Wyoming on or after the
effective date of this act.

Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)

HB0093